Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5449XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5449XD (3) 91
as/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 719.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4A. Any punishment imposed under this
section upon an inmate of a correctional institution specified
in section 904.102 shall be served consecutively to the
sentence being served by the inmate at the time of the
violation.
Sec. 2. Section 719.7A, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4A. Any punishment imposed under this
section upon an inmate of a correctional institution specified
in section 904.102 shall be served consecutively to the
sentence being served by the inmate at the time of the
violation.
Sec. 3. NEW SECTION. 719.7B Restricted or disruptive
contraband —— criminal penalties.
1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
a. “Facility” means a county jail, municipal holding
facility, or institution under the management of the department
of corrections.
b. (1) “Restricted or disruptive contraband” means any
object, material, substance, or article that is not inherently
illegal to possess under the laws of this state but that is
prohibited by the facility due to the threat it poses to the
order, discipline, or security of the facility, or to the life,
health, or safety of an individual.
(2) “Restricted or disruptive contraband” includes but is not
limited to any of the following:
(a) Tobacco, tobacco products, or electronic smoking
devices.
(b) Money, currency, negotiable instruments, or other items
of value.
(c) Cellular telephones, electronic communication devices,
or any component thereof, unless otherwise prosecuted under
LSB 5449XD (3) 91
-1- as/js 1/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
section 719.7A.
(d) Synthetic cannabinoids or synthetic cannabinoid
derivatives, whether or not listed as a controlled substance
under chapter 124, unless otherwise prosecuted under section
719.7.
(e) Pornographic or sexually explicit materials as defined
by institutional policy.
(f) Any other item designated as restricted or disruptive
contraband by the facility.
2. A person commits the offense of possessing restricted
or disruptive contraband under this section if the person,
not authorized by law or facility policy, does any of the
following:
a. Knowingly introduces, supplies, or attempts to supply
restricted or disruptive contraband to any person confined in a
correctional facility or jail, or to any person confined while
being transported or moved incidental to confinement.
b. Knowingly makes, obtains, or possesses restricted or
disruptive contraband while confined in a correctional facility
or jail, or while being transported or moved incidental to
confinement.
3. A person who possesses restricted or disruptive
contraband commits a class “D” felony.
4. a. A person commits the offense of failing to report
restricted or disruptive contraband when the person fails to
report a known violation or attempted violation of this section
to an official or officer at a facility.
b. A person who violates this subsection commits an
aggravated misdemeanor.
5. Any punishment imposed under this section upon an inmate
of a correctional institution specified in section 904.102
shall be served consecutively to the sentence being served by
the inmate at the time of the violation.
6. A sheriff, a supervising law enforcement agency, or the
department of corrections may authorize taking an X ray of a
LSB 5449XD (3) 91
-2- as/js 2/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
person under its control if there is reason to believe that the
person is in possession of restricted or disruptive contraband.
A licensed physician or x-ray technician under the supervision
of a licensed physician shall x-ray the person.
7. Nothing in this section is intended to limit the
authority of the administrator of any facility to prescribe
or enforce rules concerning the definition of restricted or
disruptive contraband, and the supplying, making, obtaining, or
possession of restricted or disruptive contraband.
8. This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict
the offenses provided in section 719.7 or 719.7A.